Montana, session 2025, HB457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 52-2-715, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-715. Family income eligibility requirements. In determining income eligibility for the best
beginnings child care scholarship program, the department shall:
(1) set a qualifying income threshold at no less than 185% of the federal poverty level 85% of the
state median income for each family size; and
(2) set a maximum qualifying income level that is no higher than that allowed by the federal child
care and development block grant."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Appropriation. (1) There is appropriated $17 million from the general
fund to the department of public health and human services for each year of the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, for the purposes of the best beginnings child care scholarship program.
(2) The legislature intends that the appropriation in this section be considered part of the ongoing
base for the next legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 457